Louisiana, session 2026, HB478.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. REIMBURSEMENT OF UTILITY OVERCHARGES
§3301. Utility overcharge reimbursement
A. For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Customer" means a person receiving services from a utility provider.
(2) "Overcharge" means any amount billed in excess of the lawful rate, tariff,
or authorized charge.
(3) "Utility provider" means a provider of water, gas, or electric service that
is regulated by the Public Service Commission or a local governmental subdivision
or owned or operated by a local governmental subdivision.
B.(1) A utility provider that has overcharged a customer shall reimburse the
amount overcharged to the customer in full within ninety calendar days after the
overcharge is discovered or reasonably should have been discovered and shall be
labeled as an overcharge reimbursement or similar description, unless otherwise
ordered by the utility's regulator.
(2) If a customer has ended service with a utility provider, then the utility
provider shall send the reimbursement to the customer's last known address,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 478 ENROLLED
provided in the former customer's account, within ninety calendar days after the
overcharge is discovered or reasonably should have been discovered and shall be
labeled as an overcharge reimbursement or similar description, unless otherwise
ordered by the utility's regulator.
C. A utility provider shall label the reimbursement required by this Section
as an overcharge reimbursement, unless otherwise ordered by the utility's regulator.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.